Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1518
Cigarette tax division; powers vested by other laws.

All of the powers vested in the division by the provisions of any law heretofore or hereafter to be enacted, shall be available to the division in the enforcement of the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act.

Laws 1965, c. 364, § 18, p. 1193.